Massachusetts, session 194th, H1066.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 11 of chapter 131 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022
Official Edition, is hereby amended by adding the following sentence:-- The George L. Darey
Inland Fisheries and Game Fund shall be reimbursed annually from the general fund for all lost
revenue attributed to the issuance of discounted and free hunting and fishing licenses.
of 1